Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-771
Revisor of Statutes; obsolete sections; compilation; duties.

The Revisor of Statutes shall establish an ongoing and comprehensive system to provide a continuing compilation of sections of the Nebraska statutes which the revisor believes to be obsolete or no longer needed. Preceding each legislative session, the Revisor of Statutes shall provide the chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council with a list of such sections. The Executive Board may request that legislation be drafted to amend or repeal the obsolete sections and such legislation when introduced shall be treated as a Revisor of Statute's correctional bill.

Laws 1980, LB 598, § 4.